test/src/gt-norm-yamls/VTA_AM_IND_waabam_gt-norm.yaml
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -i    (Thm2, 1 obj)
     #      -in   (Thm1Sg, 2 obj)
     #      -igoo (Thm1Pl 1pl v 2)
     #      -aa   (ThmDir, 3 obj)
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+1SgO:   gwaabmisiim
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+1PlO:   gwaabmisiimi
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2PlO: gwaabmisnoonnim
     #waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2PlO: gwaabmisnoonim      #1sg v 2pl #book
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Pl+2PlO: gwaabmigoosiim
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+21Pl+3SgO: gwaabmaaswaanaa
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgO: gwaabmaaswaawaa
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3Sg+21PlO: gwaabmigsiinaa
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3Sg+2PlO: gwaabmigsiiwaa
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Pl+3SgO: nwaabmaaswaanaa
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3Sg+1PlO: nwaabmigsiinaa

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 6
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -i    (Thm2, 1 obj)
     #      -in   (Thm1Sg, 2 obj)
     #      -igoo (Thm1Pl 1pl v 2)
     #      -aa   (ThmDir, 3 obj)
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+1SgO:   gwaabmisiinaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+1SgO:   gwaabmisiinaadig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2SgO: gwaabmisnoonnaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2SgO: gwaabmisnoonnaadig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Pl+2SgO: gwaabmigoosiinaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Pl+2SgO: gwaabmigoosiinaadig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgO: gwaabmaasiiba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgO: gwaabmaasiidig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3Sg+2SgO: gwaabmigsiiba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3Sg+2SgO: gwaabmigsiidig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgO: nwaabmaasiiba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgO: nwaabmaasiidig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3Sg+1SgO: nwaabmigsiiba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3Sg+1SgO: nwaabmigsiidig

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 7
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -aa   (ThmDir, 3 obj)
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3Sg+4O:  waabmaasiin     #3obv v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+4+3SgO:  waabmigsiin   #3sg v 3obv

     #2 non-neg slots ...   (4, 5), (4, 6), (4, 7)
     #                      (5, 6), (5, 7)
     #                      (6, 7)
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+2PlO: gwaabmigsiinaawaa
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+21PlO: gwaabmigsiinaa
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+1PlO: nwaabmigsiinaa
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+3PlO:  waabmigsiinaawaa      #0sg v 3sg

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+2SgO: gwaabmigsiinaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+2SgO: gwaabmigsiinaadig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+1SgO: nwaabmigsiinaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+1SgO: nwaabmigsiinaadig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+3SgO:  waabmigsiinaaba      #0sg v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+3SgO:  waabmigsiinaadig     #0sg v 3sg

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 7
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+2SgO: gwaabmigsiinan
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+1SgO: nwaabmigsiinan
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+3SgO:  waabmigsiinan      #0pl v 3sg

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -i    (Thm2, 1 obj)
     #      -in   (Thm1Sg, 2 obj)
     #      -igoo (Thm1Pl 1pl v 2)
     #      -aa   (ThmDir, 3 obj)
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+1SgO:   gwaabmisiimwaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+1SgO:   gwaabmisiimwaadig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+1PlO:   gwaabmisiimnaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+1PlO:   gwaabmisiimnaadig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2PlO: gwaabmisnoonnimwaaba
     #waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2PlO: gwaabmisnoonmwaaba  #1sg v 2pl #book
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2PlO: gwaabmisnoonnimwaadig
     #waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2PlO: gwaabmisnoonmwaadig  #1sg v 2pl #book
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Pl+2PlO: gwaabmigoosiimwaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Pl+2PlO: gwaabmigoosiimwaadig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+21Pl+3SgO: gwaabmaasiimnaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+21Pl+3SgO: gwaabmaasiimnaadig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgO: gwaabmaaswaawaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgO: gwaabmaaswaawaadig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3Sg+21PlO: gwaabmigsiimnaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3Sg+21PlO: gwaabmigsiimnaadig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3Sg+2PlO: gwaabmigsiiwaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3Sg+2PlO: gwaabmigsiiwaadig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Pl+3SgO: nwaabmaasiimnaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Pl+3SgO: nwaabmaasiimnaadig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3Sg+1PlO: nwaabmigsiimnaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3Sg+1PlO: nwaabmigsiimnaadig

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 7
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -aa   (ThmDir, 3 obj)
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+21Pl+3PlO: gwaabmaaswaanaanig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3PlO: gwaabmaaswaawaag
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3Pl+21PlO: gwaabmigsiinaanig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3Pl+2PlO: gwaabmigsiiwaag
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Pl+3PlO: nwaabmaaswaanaanig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3Pl+1PlO: nwaabmigsiinaanig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3Pl+4O:   waabmaaswaawaan      #3pl v 3obv
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+4+3PlO:   waabmigsiiwaan      #3obv v 3pl

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 6, 7
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -aa   (ThmDir, 3 obj)
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3PlO: gwaabmaasiibniig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3PlO: gwaabmaasiidgenag
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3Pl+2SgO: gwaabmigsiibniig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3Pl+2SgO: gwaabmigsiidgenag
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3PlO: nwaabmaasiibniig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3PlO: nwaabmaasiidgenag
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3Pl+1SgO: nwaabmigsiibniig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3Pl+1SgO: nwaabmigsiidgenag
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3Sg+4O:   waabmaasiibniin     #3sg v 3obv
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3Sg+4O:   waabmaasiidgenan    #3sg v 3obv
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+4+3SgO:   waabmigsiibniin     #3obv v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+4+3SgO:   waabmigsiidgenan    #3obv v 3sg

     #3 non-neg slots ...   (4, 5, 6), (4, 5, 7), (4, 6, 7)
     #                      (5, 6, 7)

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+2PlO: gwaabmigsiinaawaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+2PlO: gwaabmigsiinaawaadig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+21PlO: gwaabmigsiimnaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+21PlO: gwaabmigsiimnaadig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+1PlO: nwaabmigsiimnaaba
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+1PlO: nwaabmigsiimnaadig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+3PlO:  waabmigsiinaawaaba      #0sg v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+3PlO:  waabmigsiinaawaadig      #0sg v 3sg

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+2PlO: gwaabmigsiinaawaan
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+21PlO: gwaabmigsiinaanin
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+1PlO: nwaabmigsiinaanin
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+3PlO:  waabmigsiinaawaan      #0pl v 3pl

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+2SgO: gwaabmigsiinaabniin
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+2SgO: gwaabmigsiinaadgenan
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+1SgO: nwaabmigsiinaabniin
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+1SgO: nwaabmigsiinaadgenan
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+3SgO:  waabmigsiinaabniin    #0pl v 3sg
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+3SgO:  waabmigsiinaadgenan   #0pl v 3sg

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -aa   (ThmDir, 3 obj)
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+21Pl+3PlO: gwaabmaasiimnaabniig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+21Pl+3PlO: gwaabmaasiimnaadgenag
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3PlO: gwaabmaaswaawaabniig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3PlO: gwaabmaaswaawaadgenag
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3Pl+21PlO: gwaabmigsiimnaabniig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3Pl+21PlO: gwaabmigsiimnaadgenag
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3Pl+2PlO: gwaabmigsiiwaabniig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3Pl+2PlO: gwaabmigsiiwaadgenag
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Pl+3PlO: nwaabmaasiimnaabniig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Pl+3PlO: nwaabmaasiimnaadgenag
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3Pl+1PlO: nwaabmigsiimnaabniig
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3Pl+1PlO: nwaabmigsiimnaadgenag
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3Pl+4O:   waabmaaswaawaabniin       #3pl v 3obv
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3Pl+4O:   waabmaaswaawaadgenan      #3pl v 3obv
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+4+3PlO:   waabmigsiiwaabniin       #3obv v 3pl (0sg too?)
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+4+3PlO:   waabmigsiiwaadgenan      #3obv v 3pl (0sg too?)

     #4 non-neg slots ...   (4, 5, 6, 7)
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+2PlO: gwaabmigsiinaawaabniin
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+2PlO: gwaabmigsiinaawaadgenan
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+21PlO: gwaabmigsiimnaabniin
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+21PlO: gwaabmigsiimnaadgenan
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+1PlO: nwaabmigsiimnaabniin
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+1PlO: nwaabmigsiimnaadgenan   
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+3PlO:  waabmigsiinaawaabniin    #0pl v 3pl
     waabmaa+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+3PlO:  waabmigsiinaawaadgenan   #0pl v 3pl
